Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-278
Hearing; witnesses; testimony; cross-examination; availability of witnesses.

(1) The student, the student's parent, guardian, or representative, the principal, or the hearing examiner may ask witnesses to testify at the hearing requested under sections 79-268 and 79-269. Such testimony shall be under oath, and the hearing examiner shall be authorized to administer the oath. The hearing examiner shall make reasonable effort to assist the student or the student's parent, guardian, or representative in obtaining the attendance of witnesses. The school district shall make available those witnesses who have knowledge of or were involved in the alleged misconduct and subsequent discipline of the student if such witnesses are requested by the student or the student's parent, guardian, or representative and such witnesses are employees or under contract with the school district.

(2) The student, the student's parent, guardian, or representative, the principal, or the hearing examiner has the right to question any witness giving information at the hearing.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 22;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 28;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,191;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 82;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 71.